Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,100
Council; disposal of low-level radioactive waste; adopt rules and regulations; considerations.

In order to carry out the purposes of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act, the council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the disposal of low-level radioactive waste. In adopting such rules and regulations, the council shall consider, but not be limited to, requirements for licensing, including terms, conditions, amendment, suspension, or revocation thereof, performance objectives and technical requirements, financial assurance, record-keeping, reporting, testing, and such other requirements established by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission at 10 C.F.R. part 61.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 23.